Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202577-202.05
Property taxable; exempt status; Tax Commissioner; forms; prescribe; contents.

The Tax Commissioner shall prescribe forms for distribution to the county assessors on which persons, corporations, and organizations may apply for tax-exempt status for real or tangible personal property. The forms shall include the following information:

(1) Name of owner or owners of the property, and if a corporation, the names of the officers and directors, and place of incorporation;

(2) Legal description of real property and a general description as to class and use of all tangible personal property;

(3) The precise statutory provision under which exempt status for such property is claimed;

(4) An estimated valuation for the property; and

(5) For applications for tax-exempt status for property described in subdivision (1)(f) of section 77-202:

(a) Proof of the recorded easement; and

(b) Certification from the eligible holder, as defined in section 77-215, confirming compliance with public access and connectivity requirements.

Laws 1963, c. 441, § 5, p. 1461;

Laws 1969, c. 643, § 1, p. 2557;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 32;

Laws 1997, LB 271, § 44;

Laws 2000, LB 968, § 30;

Laws 2007, LB334, § 19;

Laws 2021, LB521, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB647, § 29.